dictionaries/sl_SI/hyph_sl_SI.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
1'.
NEXTLEVEL
.av5r
.a1v
.di6spo1
.di1s1
.di1sp
.ek3s
.e1k
.ek5v
.i1s1
.i1z1
.obi4d
.o1b
.obi1
.ob5i1t
.o1d1
.po4d5n
.po1
.po1d
.po4v5s
.po1v
.pre6d7n
.pre1
.pre1d
.se4k5s
.se1k
.si4s1
.si1
.st4
.voz5l
.vo1z
.vo1z5n
.z1li1z6
.z1l2i1
a1a
a1b
ab5ba
ab6ro1d
abro1
a1c
ac5ci
a2cc
a1č
a1d
ad2l
a6dobl
ad2o
ado1b
ad6rl.
ad2r1l
ad6rla
ad6ro1b
adro1
ad5ur
a1e1
a1f
af5ga
a2f1t
a1g
a1h
a4hm
ah5mi
ah5mo
a1i
ai2n1
a1j
a4j5e1k
a4jf
aj5fi
aj5fo
aj5ha
a2jh
aj5he
aj5i1m
aj6imo
a2j3o1s
aj6s2t1b
a2j1s
a5ju.
aju1
a2j3u1č
aj3u1g
aj5žn
a1k
ak4s
a4ks1t
a1l
a1m
a4mz
a1n
an6d5ga
a2n3d2
an2d1g
an6d5hi
an2d1h
a4nm
an5mi
an5z4i
a2n1z
a1o
ao2b1
a1p
a4ph
a1ra
ar6d1wa
a2r1d
a1re1
a1ri1
a1ro1
a1ru
ar5xa
ar5xo
ar5xu
a1s
a4sš
as5š2č
a1š
a1t
a4t1f
at4i
a1u1
a4u1f
a2uk
a4u1l
a1v
av5ši
a4vž
av5ža
ay5to
a1ze
az5fo
a4z1i1g
a1zi
az3la
az3le1
a3z4li1l
az1l2i1
a5z4li1t
a5z4li1v
a4z1o1b
a1zo
a4z3o1č
az5o1ra
az5o1ro1
a4zra
a1z1r
az4re1d
azre1
az5v1p
az1v2
a1ž
a4ž5mi
ba6b5ba
ba1b
ba2n3č4
ba1n
ba4u1
2b1c
2b1č
2b1d
be1
be4v
b1h
bi1
b1ja
b4ja.
b5je1l
b3je1m
b5je1t
2b1k
b3le1p
ble1
b5leta
ble1t
b5li1l
bl2i1
b5li1t
b5li1v
b1m
4bmi
2b1n
bo1
bo6chm
bo1c
b5o2r1d
bo5v1p
bo1v
b3ra1b
b5ra1s
b3ra1š
b3re1z
bre1
bre4z2g
bre4zi
bre4z1r
b5reže
bre1ž
b3ro1b
bro1
br6ž5da
br1ž
2b1s
2b1š
2b1t
bu5ki1
bu5ku
bu5kv
bu5ry
2b1v
b1z
b1ž
2cc
2ch.
ch5ma
2ck
c1ka
ck1o2
c5ko.
cko1v3
ck1s
ck5we
2c1n
2c1t
2č1b
2č1g
či1
1čj
2č1k
1čl
4č3le1t
čle1
č5me1s
2č1n
4čo1p
2č1p
2č1s
4ču1p
2d1b
2d1c
2d1č
2d1d
dd6vo1j
d2d1v
d2e
6d5ele1m
de1l
dele1
de4mi1n
de1m
de4mn
de4z3i
de1z
2d1g
2d1h
di5ck
di1c
4d1i2n3d2
di1n
d4i5no
di1s1
di4skr
di6spr
di1sp
2d1j
2d1k
5dle1t
dle1
d2l2i1
d5li1t
d5li1v
d1lo1
2d3m
4d3na1c
dna1
4d5na1č
4d5na1p
4d3nar
4d1na1s
4d5ne1b
dne1
d5ni1v
4d5ni1z
4d5nja1č
4d3no1ž
d2o
4do2b1č
do1b
4d5o2b1d
2d3o2f
do5r1d
do5vč
do1v
do5v4z2
2d1p
d5raz
d3re1p
dre1
dre6pn
d4re1v
2d1s
2d1š
2d1t
dteks6
dte1k
d4ur
du5ro1
du5u1m
2d1v
4d3vi
2d1z2
e1a
e1b
eb4j
eb6li1z
ebl2i1
e1c
e1č
e4čd
eč5d2e
eč5di
eč5d2o
eč3le1
e1čl
e4č5o1p
e4čt
eč5ti
eč5to
eč5tr
e4č5u1p
e2č1v
eč6v2r1s
e1d
e4df
ed5i1g
ed2l
ed5o1b
ed2o
ed6obe1
ed6obr
e4do2b1s
e4d3o1č
ed5vč
e2d1v
ed5z1b
e2d1z2
e1e
e4e1p
e1f
e4ff
ef5fe1
ef5ta
e2ft
e1g
e1h
e1i
ei6p1zi
ei1p
ei2z
eiz5e
e1j
e1k
ek6ma1l
e2k1m
ek6tre1
e2k1t
e3ktr
e1l
e1m
e1n
e1o1
eob4j
eo1b
eob4r
eo4dl
eo1d
eo4z5n
eo1z
e1p
ep5ni1k
e1ra
e3ra6z5l
era5z4r
era5z4v2
e1re1
e4r1f
e1ri1
e1ro1
e4r1r
e1ru
e1s
es5da
e5sta
e5sti.
e5sti1h
e5sti1l
e1š
e4šp
eš5po1
e1t
4eth
e4t1i2n1š
eti1n
e1u1
e1v
eve6t5l
eve1t
ev5ha
ev6pre1
e2v1p
ev6ste
ev5stv
2ew
ew6i2n3d2
ewi1n
ew5le1
e4wt
ew5to
e4y1w
e1z
ez5d1j
e2z1d2
e3z4dr
ez2g
ez5gl
e5zi1j
e1zi
ez6ijo
ez5imn
ezi1m
e5z1i1s
ez6ist
ez5i1z
ez4l
ez6lo1m
ezlo1
ez6ma1n
e2z1m
ez4mo
e4z1o1b
e1zo
e4z5or
ez4re1
e1z1r
e4z1t
e4z5u4m5
e1zu
e4z1ž
e1ž
1fa
fe1
fe6l2j1t
fe1l
ff5ma
fi6zlj
fi1z
fiz1l
2f1n
fo6u1ri1
fo1u
fre4u1
fre1
2f1s
2ft
ft5ve
fu1
2g1d
ge6ige
ge1i
gei1g
ge2l5č4
ge1l
ge6n2j1č
ge1n
gi6t5pr
gi1t
go1
go5v1z2
go1v
2g1t
gu1
ha4u1
2h1č
he4i
2h1k
4hl.
h4lo1
2h1n
h5re1n
hre1
2h1š
2h1t
1hu
hu6ffm
hu1f
i1a
i1b
i1c
i4cs
i1ča
i1če
i1či1
ič5ra
i1ču
ič5vr
i1d
4idor
id2o
i1e1
i1f
i1g
4igh
i1h
i1i
ii2n1
i1j
i1k
i4kč
ik5ča
i1l
il5č4k
i2l1č
4ile1
4ilo1
i1m
i4mh
im5hi
i1n
1i2n3d2
2ine1
3i4n3o1s
1i2n1p
3inse
i2n1s
1i2n1š
4inšk
3intr
i2n1t
i1o1
i1p
i1r
4ire1
i1s
is4a
is6e2r1t
i1si1s4
isi1
i4skv
2i2s1s
i1š
i1t
it5pr
i1u
i1v
i4v5jo
i2v1j
i1x
i1z
iz1l
iz4la
i1z1li4z5
iz1l2i1
iz5me
i2z1m
iz5mo
iz6od2e
i1zo
i2z1o1d
iz5po1
i2z1p
i2z1r
i1z1u
iz6u1re1
i1ž
j5a2k1t
ja1k
2j1b
2j1c
2j1č
2j1d
je4ks4
je1k
2j1g
2jh
j1hi
4jime
ji1m
4j5i2n1t
ji1n
2j1k
2j1l
2j1m
2j1n
4jo1b
2j1o1d
jod4l
2jo1s
4jo1ž
2j1p
2j1r
jra1
jraz4
2j1s
jsis6t
jsi1
jsi1s1
2j1š
2j1t
ju1
2ju1č
ju5d3m
ju1d
2ju1s
ju2ž1
2j1v
2j1z
jz6ve1s
jz1v2
2k1c
2k1d
ke5ti
ke1t
ki1
2k1m
1kn
ko1
ko1k4
ko5k1d
ko6vše
ko1v
koz6lo1
ko1z
1kre1
2ks.
k5sa1t
k1s1c
k1s1p
ks4po1
ks1t
4k2st.
ks6taz4
k3s5te
2k1t
3ktr
4ktra
ku5ro1
k5vi1p
la4i1r
la1i
la6vz.
la1v
lavz2
2l1b
2l1c
2l1č
2l1d
le1
le4e
le6ipz
le1i
lei1p
le5me
le1m
2l1f
2l1g
lg5ča
2l1h
l2i1
li6d8ž.
li1d
1li1z
4l5i2z1d2
2lj.
4l2j1c
2l2j1č
2l2j1k
2l2j1n
2l2j1s
2l2j1š
lju5d6j
lju1
lju1d
2l1k
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
lo1
1lo1č
2l1p
2l1s
2l1š
2l1t
lu5ki1
lu5ku
2l1v
2l1z
2l1ž
2m1b
2m1c
2m1č
2m1d
me4d5n
me1d
me6do1s
med2o
me4dr
2m1f
4m1i2n3d2
mi1n
4m1i2n1p
4m1i2n1š
mi6th.
mi1t
2m1k
2m1m
m5ni1v
mo6št.
mo1š
mo6v8š.
mo1v
2m1p
2m1s
2m1š
2m1t
m5u2r1n
2m1v
my5hi
2m1ž
na1
5nače1l
na1č
na4d5nj
na1d
nad5r
na6dra
na4dre1
na6d5ur
1na1j
na6ja1k
na4j5e1n
naj3o
na6jo1č
na4j3u1
1na1s
na4v3z2
na1v
navze6
1naz
naz6or
na1zo
2n1b
2n1c
2nč
n1ča
n1če
n1či1
n1ču
2n3d2
nd5ga
n2d1g
nd5hi
n2d1h
n4d3m
ne1
ne3d2
1ne1h
ne3z1m
ne1z
nez4v2
2n1f
2n1g
n4gh
ng5ha
n4gv
ng5vi
2n1h
2nj.
2n2j1c
nje4v5s
nje1v
2n2j1k
2n2j1s
2n2j1š
4n2j1v
2n1k
2n1l
2n1n
no5r1d
n4ost
no1s
2n1p
2n1s
nsi1s4
nsi1
2n1š
2n1t
nteks4
nte1k
n4tg
nt5ga
nt5ge
n4tv
nt5vi
nu1
2n1v
ny5qu2
2n1z
n1z4i
2n1ž
o1a
o4a1s
o1b
ob5gl
ob5id2e
obi1
obi1d
ob5jo
5obla
5obro1
o4b1z
o1c
oc5ke
o2ck
oc5ki1
o4cr
o1č
o1d
od5d1v
o2d1d
od5na1l
odna1
o6d3re1p
odre1
od5z1d2
o2d1z2
o2d1ž
o1e
oele4
oe1l
o1f
o1g
4ogl
o1h
o1i
oi1z2
o1j
o1k
o4kb
ok5ba
ok5be1
o4k1t
o1l
o6l5a2v1t
ola1v
ol6g5ča
o2l1g
o4lr
ol5re1
o1m
o1n
o1o
ood4l
oo1d
o2o1l
o4o1m
o1p
o4pm
op5me
4opy
o1ra
or4de1č
o2r1d
ord2e
o1re1
o1ri1
o1ro1
o1ru
o1s
5ose1b
ose4m5
o1š
o1t
o1u
ou5ki1
ou5ku
o1v
ov5se1m
o4v5šk
o2v1z2
o5v2z2a
ov3z1d2
o1y
o1z
o2z4b
oz2d5j
o2z1d2
oz4g
oz5lo1
o3z6lo1ž
o1z2n
oz5ni1c
oz5ni1š
o1z2o
o1z2r
oz2v2
o1ž
o4ž5mi
2p1c
2p3č2
pč5ka
p2č1k
pe1
1pe1č
pe4k1t
pe1k
pet3l
pe1t
pe4tle1
pe4v5s
pe1v
pe2v5t4
4phs
ph5so
pi5zo
pi1z
2p1k
4plo1z
plo1
po1
po6d1fa
po1d
po4d3l
po4dna1
po4d5o1č
pod2o
po6lo1b
po1l
polo1
po6s2t1d
po1s
pre1z4
pre1
2p1s
2p1š
2p1t
pz6ig.
p1zi
pz1i1g
qu2
3raču
ra1č
2ra1e1
ra6j5žn
ra1j
rav5z2
ra1v
ra6v2z2a
ra4z5i1d
ra1zi
3razl
ra4z5or
ra1zo
2r1b
2r1c
2r1č
2r1d
re1
3rea1l
re1a
re6c2h1t
re1c
re5č1v
re1č
5re2d1č
re1d
re6d5i1g
re6dnju1
re6iba
re1i
rei1b
re5jo
re1j
re5k1m
re1k
re6s5da
re1s
rev6sk
re1v
re6zna1č
re1z
re1zn
rezna1
re6zu1s
re1zu
re6zve
rez1v2
r1f
2r1g
2r1h
ri1
r4i1n
ri5n4o
riz4g
ri1z
riz4l
ri1z4n
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
ro1
rob6i1d
ro1b
robi1
3rodi
ro1d
ro5z2o
ro1z
2r1p
r1r
2r1s
2r1š
2r1t
r4th
rt5ha
ru5kl
2r1v
r3v2j
r4v5jo
ry5a1n
2r1z
rz2l
r1ž
rž5da
2s1b
1sc
4sc.
s2ci
se4k5sa
se1k
sek5si1
se5ma
se1m
se5v1p
se1v
2s1f
si1
s4i1d
si6gn.
si1g
si1s1
2s1j
2sk.
s2kn
4s1kre1
s4la1v
s4o1n
soni5
sonič4
1sp
s4plo1d
splo1
spo4d4l
spo1
spo1d
2s1s
2st.
3ste
s4te1n
4st1f
s4tič
5sti1m
s4ti1r
2s2t1k
2s2t1m
1str
s4tra.
su1
su4bo1
su1b
sve5t
š2č
2š8č.
2š2č1k
2š2č1n
še2s
2š1j
ta5wi
taz4
2t1b
2t1c
tch5o
2t1d
tek6s1t
te1k
5tema
te1m
te5xa
t1f
4t1i2n3d2
ti1n
4t3i4n3o1s
4t1i2n1p
4t3inse
ti2n1s
4t3i2n1t
2t1k
6tletno
tle1
tle1t
2t1m
4t1na1j
tna1
to6v8ž.
to1v
trt5u1
t2r1t
tr6tur
2t1s
2t1t
tu1
4tz.
2u1a
u1b
ub4j
u4bp
ub5po1
u1c
u1č
u1d
ud6mi.
u2d3m
u1e
u1f
u1g
u1h
u1i
u1j
u1ka
u1ke
u1ko1
u1l
u1m
u1n
u1p
up6č5ka
u2p3č2
up2č1k
u1ra
u1re1
4u2r1g
u1ri1
u1s
1u1sp
u1š
uše3s
u1t
u4th
uth5o
u1v
ux5e1m
u1z
u1ž
2v1b
2v1c
2vč
v1ča
v1če
v4čer
v1či1
2v1d
ve4čl
ve1č
ve4čm
ve4i
ve4ti1n
ve1t
ve1tle6t
vetle1
v1f
v1g
vi5d1v
vi1d
vid6va
1vi1v
vi6žg.
vi1ž
2v1j
4vjo
2v1k
2v1m
2v1n
vo5r1d
voz5le1
vo1z
2v1p
3v2pa
v4pi1j
v4pi1l
v5s2kn
v5še1k
4všk
2v1t
v2t4k
vz2
v2z2a
3v2z1g
2v3z1k
2v1zo
v3z1p
v2zu
1wa
wo2
x1f
1ye
2y1f
y1j
y1l
y1w
1z2a
z6ane.
za1n
zane1
za5uk
za1u1
za3v1p
za1v
za1z2
za5z1d2
2z1b
3zbi1r
zbi1
z1c
2z1č
2z1d2
zd5ju1
z2d1j
z3d1v
z1g
z4gni
z5go1t
zgo1
2z1h
1zi
z1i1g
2z1i1s
4z5iš2č
zi1š
2z1j
2z1k
z3ku
z5la1s
z1l2i1
3zli1l
5zli1t
5zli1v
z1li1z5
1zlj
3zlo1g
zlo1
z5lo1m
3zlo1ž
z1lu
2z1m
1zn
1zo
z1o1b
2z1o1d
z1o1g
z2o1l
z4o1m
2z1p
1z1r
4z5re2d1č
zre1
zre1d
4zre1š
4zre1z
4zre1ž
4zri1
4zru
2z1s
z1š
z1t
1zu
z4u1j
2z1u1p
2z1u1z
z1v2
z4ve1n
z3v1n
3z4vo1j
z4vo1k
2z1z2
z1ž
2ž1b
2ž1c
2ž1č
2ž1j
2ž1k
4žmi
.č8
.š8
.ž8
8ž.
8š.
8č.
8-8
8a8-8
8b8-8
8c8-8
8č8-8
8d8-8
8e8-8
8f8-8
8g8-8
8h8-8
8i8-8
8j8-8
8k8-8
8l8-8
8m8-8
8n8-8
8o8-8
8p8-8
8r8-8
8s8-8
8š8-8
8t8-8
8u8-8
8v8-8
8z8-8
8ž8-8
-a8
-b8
-c8
-č8
-d8
-e8
-f8
-g8
-h8
-i8
-j8
-k8
-l8
-m8
-n8
-o8
-p8
-r8
-s8
-š8
-t8
-u8
-v8
-z8
-ž8
8'8
8a8'8
8b8'8
8c8'8
8č8'8
8d8'8
8e8'8
8f8'8
8g8'8
8h8'8
8i8'8
8j8'8
8k8'8
8l8'8
8m8'8
8n8'8
8o8'8
8p8'8
8r8'8
8s8'8
8š8'8
8t8'8
8u8'8
8v8'8
8z8'8
8ž8'8
'a8
'b8
'c8
'č8
'd8
'e8
'f8
'g8
'h8
'i8
'j8
'k8
'l8
'm8
'n8
'o8
'p8
'r8
's8
'š8
't8
'u8
'v8
'z8
'ž8
